Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.175

Special election.

"Special election" means any election that is not a general election and may be held in conjunction with a general election or primary.

[ 2003 c 111 s 129; 1965 c 9 s 29.01.170. Prior: Code 1881 s 3056; 1865 p 27 s 2; RRS s 5155. Formerly RCW 29.01.170.]